Wyoming statutes. Title 19 Defense Forces and Affairs
Article 2. Fiscal Provisions

§ 19-7-201.
Disposition of property sale proceeds.

All funds received from sale of state-owned properties under the control of the adjutant general and not otherwise disposed of pursuant to W.S. 19-7-103(b)(xii) shall be deposited in the general fund.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 245, § 2; 1977, ch. 138, § 1; W.S. 1977, §

19-1-108

; Laws 1998, ch. 99, § 3.

Cross references. —

For similar provision concerning sale of state guard equipment, see §

19-10-111

.

§ 19-7-202.
Insurance for employees of military department; generally.

The adjutant general of Wyoming may provide prepaid plan or group insurance for life, health, accident or hospitalization for the employees of the military department of Wyoming and enter into agreements with prepaid hospital and medical care plans or insurance companies to provide the coverage.

A prepaid plan or insurance shall be procured only from prepaid plans or insurance companies authorized to do business in this state.

Upon a request in writing from any employee of the military department, the adjutant general may deduct from the wages of the employee the amount of the premium which the employee has agreed to pay for the insurance and pay or remit the same directly to the prepaid plan or insurance company issuing the group plan or insurance.

History.

Laws 1969, ch. 72, §§ 45 to 47; 1977, ch. 138, § 1; W.S. 1977, §

19-2-702

; Laws 1998, ch. 99, § 4.

§ 19-7-203.
Printing and distribution.

The governor shall from time to time cause such numbers of this act as may be deemed necessary to be printed and distributed to members of the military department.

History.

Laws 1969, ch. 72, § 48; 1977, ch. 138, § 1; W.S. 1977, §

19-2-703

; Laws 1998, ch. 99, § 3.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 19-7-101(a)(xii).

§ 19-7-204.
Airports and highways for defense; cooperation with United States for construction.

The state department of transportation may cooperate and contract with the government of the United States and other state agencies in the making of surveys, plans, specifications and estimates for, and in the construction, reconstruction and maintenance of, flight strips, airports, roads and bridges necessary to provide access to military and naval reservations, defense industries, defense-industry sites and sources of raw materials, shut off from general public use at military and naval reservations and defense-industry sites.

In cooperating with the government of the United States and other state agencies the state department of transportation may use monies from the state highway fund for payment of the state’s share of preliminary and construction engineering costs of flight strips, airports and roads.

History.

Laws 1943, ch. 90, §§ 1, 2; 1945, ch. 66, §§ 1, 2; C.S. 1945, §§ 30-501, 30-502; W.S. 1957, §§ 19-1, 19-2; Laws 1973, ch. 245, § 3; Laws 1977, ch. 138, § 1; 1991, ch. 241, § 3; W.S. 1977, §

19-1-101

; Laws 1998, ch. 99, § 4.

§ 19-7-205.
Wyoming military department billeting operations fund; investment by state treasurer.

A fund is established which shall be known as the Wyoming military department billeting operations fund.

Monies received from the operation of billeting activities shall be transmitted to the state treasurer for credit to the fund monthly and shall be invested by the state treasurer as authorized under W.S. 9-4-715(a), (d) and (e) in a manner designed to obtain the highest return possible consistent with preservation of the transmitted monies. Income and any interest earned from investment of the fund shall be monthly credited by the state treasurer to the fund and distributed in accordance with W.S.

19-7-206

.

History.

Laws 2011, ch. 155, § 1.

Effective dates. —

Laws 2011, ch. 155, § 2, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 3, 2011.

§ 19-7-206.
Wyoming military department billeting operations fund; uses of fund; administration; rulemaking.

Income and any interest earned from the billeting operations fund created by W.S.

19-7-205

shall be administered by the adjutant general.

Income and any interest earned in the billeting operations fund shall be used only to operate day to day billeting activities at Camp Guernsey for the benefit of paying customers using chargeable quarters, including personnel, cleaning, laundry and amenity services.

No minimum balance is required to be maintained in the fund. The fund may be drawn to a zero balance at any time using normal approval processes for the movement of monies.

The adjutant general shall promulgate rules and regulations for the administration of the billeting operations fund created by W.S.

19-7-205

.

History.

Laws 2011, ch. 155, § 1.

Effective dates. —

Laws 2011, ch. 155, § 2, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 3, 2011.

§ 19-7-207.
Wyoming national guard youth challenge program endowment account; administration; distributions; purposes.

The Wyoming national guard youth challenge program endowment account is created. The state treasurer is authorized to accept cash gifts for the account. Funds within the account including all funds deposited to the account from any source are intended to be inviolate and constitute a permanent or perpetual trust fund. The state treasurer shall invest funds within the endowment account in accordance with law and in a manner to obtain the highest net return possible consistent with the preservation of the trust fund corpus. Fifty percent (50%) of investment earnings from funds in the endowment account shall be credited to the endowment account. Fifty percent (50%) of investment earnings shall be distributed in accordance with subsection (b) of this section.

The state treasurer shall semiannually distribute fifty percent (50%) of investment earnings from the Wyoming national guard youth challenge program endowment account to the Wyoming military department. Funds distributed under this subsection shall only be expended for the operation and facility needs of the Wyoming national guard youth challenge program established under W.S.

19-9-701

. Funds distributed under this subsection shall be expended pursuant to W.S.

19-9-702

.

The Wyoming national guard youth challenge program endowment account created in subsection (a) of this section may be known as the “Wyoming cowboy challenge academy endowment account.”

History.

2019 ch. 50, § 1, effective February 18, 2019; 2021 ch. 108, § 1, effective July 1, 2021.

The 2021 amendment

, effective July 1, 2021, in the third sentence of (a), added “and in a manner to obtain the highest net return possible consistent with the preservation of the trust fund corpus.”

Effective date. —

Laws 2019, ch. 50, § 2, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by
art. 4, § 8 of the Wyo. Const. Approved February 18, 2019.

§ 19-7-208.
Authority to receive and expend monies; investments.

In addition to the account established in W.S.

19-7-207

, the state treasurer is hereby authorized and directed to receive and credit to the appropriate account any grant, donation or bequest that is made to the state of Wyoming or the military department for the support of any program of the military department. If the grant, donation or bequest contains a condition or restriction regarding how it is to be expended it shall be expended according to the condition or restriction. The state treasurer shall invest any money received under this subsection in accordance with law, and the income received thereon shall be placed at the disposal of the department to use in carrying out the purposes of the specified program subject to any conditions or restrictions.

The department shall have the authority:

To receive any gifts, grants, funds, assistance or other contributions of any kind or character that are donated, granted or bequeathed to the department or the state of Wyoming for the support of any program of the department;

To establish methods whereby voluntary contributions may be accepted in support of military department programs. The military department may suggest and solicit specific contribution amounts;

To carry out the terms, if any, of any grant, donation or bequest for the support of any program of the department, or in the absence of any terms or limitations, to expend the money or the proceeds of any property received as the department may deem advisable according to the purposes of the specified program.

Funds received for the support of any program of the military department under subsections (a) and (b) of this section shall be credited to the appropriate account for the purposes of the specified program and are continuously appropriated to the military department. The military department shall only expend funds, proceeds or property received under this section for the purposes of the program for which the money or property was provided. Funds received and expended in each fiscal biennium pursuant to the authority of this section shall be reported by the military department in its biennial budget request.

History.

2020 ch. 12, § 1, effective March 5, 2020.

Effective date. —

Laws 2020, ch. 12, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by
art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 5, 2020.

§ 19-7-209.
Military department range management operations; account; administration; rulemaking.

There is created the military department range management and grazing program. The military department shall administer range management and grazing operations at Camp Guernsey and any other Wyoming national guard training areas that are owned in fee by the military department and that are not state lands as defined in W.S. 36-1-101(a)(iv). The military department range management and grazing program shall:

Oversee the day to day range management and grazing operations within the training area;

Arrange for personnel and materials for range improvements, including maintenance and repair of fencing, vegetation management, water development, wildfire rehabilitation and restoration and management of invasive species;

Determine animal unit grazing usage and needs and develop and monitor forage use plans;

Maintain lessee and neighbor relationships;

Respond to required cultural and environmental assessments related to grazing management.

The military department range management and grazing account is created. Monies received from the range management and grazing operations authorized in subsection (a) of this section shall be credited to the account, except as otherwise provided in this subsection. Funds in the military department range management and grazing account in an amount not to exceed two hundred thousand dollars ($200,000.00) per biennium are continuously appropriated to the military department and shall only be used for purposes of this section. The state treasurer shall invest monies received under this paragraph in accordance with law and the investment earnings received therefrom shall be deposited into the military department range management operations account. From the monies received from the operations authorized in subsection (a) of this section, any amount in excess of two hundred thousand dollars ($200,000.00) in the account at the end of each fiscal biennium shall be deposited into the general fund.

The military department shall promulgate rules to administer this section.

The adjutant general shall report annually by October 15 to the joint transportation, highways and military affairs interim committee regarding all income to and expenditures from the military department range management operations account.

History.

2021 ch. 121, § 1, effective April 6, 2021.

Effective date. —

Laws 2021, ch. 121, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by
art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved April 6, 2021.